Illinois, session 104th, HB2729.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Riparian Protection and Water Quality Practices Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Buffer" means an area that consists of perennial 8vegetation, excluding invasive plants and noxious weeds, that 9is adjacent to bodies of water within the State, that protects 10water resources from runoff pollution, that stabilizes soils, 11shores, and banks, and that protects or provides riparian 12corridors.13    "Buffer-protection map" means maps of buffer areas 14established and maintained by the Department of Natural 15Resources.16    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.17    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.18    "Local water management authority" means a county, 19municipal government, drainage district, or watershed 20management authority authorized under Illinois law to oversee 21water management practices.22    "Normal water level" means the level evidenced by the 23long-term presence of surface water as indicated directly by   HB2729- 2 -LRB104 11125 BDA 21207 b1hydrophytic plants or hydric soils, or indirectly determined 2via hydrological models or analysis.3    "Public waters" means waters under the jurisdiction of 4Illinois as defined by the Environmental Protection Act and 5rules adopted under the Act.6    "With jurisdiction" means a determination by the 7Department that a county or local authority has adopted and is 8implementing rules, ordinances, or official controls providing 9procedures for compliance with this Act. This determination is 10revocable by the Department if the adoption and implementation 11of such rules or controls are not in compliance with the 12requirements of this Act. 13    Section 10. Purpose. It is the policy of the State of 14Illinois to establish riparian buffers and water quality 15practices to: (1) protect State water resources from erosion 16and runoff pollution; (2) stabilize soils, shores, and banks; 17and (3) protect or provide riparian corridors. 18    Section 15. Riparian protection requirements for public 19waters and drainage system.     (a) Landowners owning property 20adjacent to a water body identified and mapped on a 21buffer-protection map must maintain a buffer to protect the 22State's water resources as follows:23        (1) For public waters, the buffer shall be (i) a 24    50-foot average width, 30-foot minimum width, continuous   HB2729- 3 -LRB104 11125 BDA 21207 b1    buffer of perennially rooted vegetation or (ii) as 2    specified by the Illinois Rivers, Lakes, and Streams Act 3    or other applicable State rules.4        (2) For public drainage systems, the buffer shall be a 5    minimum 16.5-foot continuous buffer as required under 6    applicable drainage district rules and shall not impede 7    future maintenance of the drainage system.8    (b) Landowners engaged in cultivation farming adjacent to 9identified water bodies may meet the requirements under 10subsection (a) by implementing retention ponds or other 11measures preventing overland flow to the water resource or by 12using alternative riparian water quality practices based on: 13(i) the Natural Resources Conservation Service Field Office 14Technical Guide; (ii) common practices approved by the 15Department; or (iii) locally approved practices by the soil 16and water conservation district.17    (c) Buffers on public waters must be measured from the top 18or crown of the bank or, if no defined bank exists, from the 19edge of the normal water level. Buffers on public drainage 20systems must follow measurement guidelines established by the 21drainage authority.22    (d) Buffers or alternative practices required under this 23Section must be implemented by: (1) November 1, 2026, for 24public waters and (2) November 1, 2027, for public drainage 25systems.26    (e) Landowners planting buffers after the effective date   HB2729- 4 -LRB104 11125 BDA 21207 b1of this Act must use seed mixes approved by the Department of 2Agriculture to prevent contamination by invasive species or 3noxious weeds. 4    Section 20. Local water resources and riparian protection.5    (a) Soil and water conservation districts, in consultation 6with local water management authorities, must develop and 7submit to each local water management authority a summary of 8watercourses within their jurisdiction by July 1, 2026.9    (b) Local water management authorities must incorporate 10these recommendations into their comprehensive water 11management plans by July 1, 2027, without requiring a formal 12plan amendment, provided the recommendations are distributed 13to relevant stakeholders. 14    Section 25. Exemptions. A landowner is exempt from the 15requirements of Section 15 with respect to land that is: (1) 16enrolled in the federal Conservation Reserve Program; (2) used 17as a public or private water access or recreational area; (3) 18covered by a road, trail, building, or other structures; (4) 19regulated by a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System 20(NPDES) permit; (5) part of a water-inundation cropping 21system; or (6) temporarily nonvegetated due to authorized 22construction, maintenance, or conservation projects. 23    Section 30. Local implementation and assistance.  HB2729- 5 -LRB104 11125 BDA 21207 b1    (a) Soil and water conservation districts must assist 2landowners with planning, technical support, and 3implementation of water resource protection requirements.4    (b) The Department must provide sufficient funding to 5local authorities and conservation districts to implement this 6Act. 7    Section 35. Corrective actions.8    (a) Noncompliant landowners will receive notice from the 9local water management authority, including required 10corrective actions and timelines.11    (b) Authorities may enforce compliance through 12administrative penalties or other measures if corrective 13actions are not taken.14    (c) Penalties may be forgiven upon sufficient corrective 15actions. 16    Section 40. Withholding funding. The Department may 17withhold funding from local authorities that fail to implement 18this Act, with restoration contingent upon approval of a 19corrective action plan. 20    Section 45. Appeals. Landowners may appeal validation or 21penalty decisions to the Department within 30 days of 22notification. The Director shall issue a final administrative 23decision within 60 days, which is appealable to the Illinois   HB2729- 6 -LRB104 11125 BDA 21207 b1courts in accordance with the Administrative Review Law. 2    Section 50. Landowner Financial Assistance. Landowners may 3contact soil and water conservation districts for information 4on financial assistance to establish buffers or alternative 5water resource protection measures. 6    Section 55. Applicability to State Lands. This Act applies 7to State lands and agencies, ensuring consistency across 8public and private lands.